California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) (A) The Board of State and Community Corrections shall conduct, at a minimum, a biennial inspection of each jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility situated in this state that, during the preceding calendar year, was used for confinement, for more than 24 hours, of any juvenile. The board shall promptly notify the operator of any jail, juvenile hall, lockup, special purpose
 juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility of any noncompliance found, upon inspection, with any of the minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Section 210, 210.2, 875, 885, or subdivision (e) of Section 207.1.

(B) Any duly authorized officer, employee, or agent of the board may, upon presentation of proper identification, enter and inspect any area of any juvenile local detention facility, without notice, to conduct an inspection required or authorized by this paragraph.

(4) If either a judge of the juvenile court or the board, after inspection of a jail, juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, lockup, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility finds that it is not being operated
 and maintained as a suitable place for the confinement of juveniles, the juvenile court or the board shall give notice of its finding to all persons having authority to confine juveniles pursuant to this chapter and, commencing 60 days thereafter, the facility shall not be used for confinement of juveniles until the time the judge or board, as the case may be, finds, after reinspection of the facility, that the conditions that rendered the facility unsuitable have been remedied, and the facility is a suitable place for confinement of juveniles.

(5) The custodian of each jail, juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, lockup, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility shall make any reports as may be requested by the board or the juvenile court to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(b) (1) The Board of State and Community Corrections may inspect
 any law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults and that it has reason to believe may not be in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 207.1 or with the certification requirements or standards adopted under Section 210.2. A judge of the juvenile court shall conduct an annual inspection, either in person or through a delegated member of the appropriate county or regional juvenile justice commission, of any law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults that, in the preceding year, was used for the secure detention of any juvenile. If the law enforcement facility is observed, upon inspection, to be out of compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 207.1, or with any standard adopted under Section 210.2, the board or the judge shall promptly notify the operator of the law enforcement facility of the specific points of noncompliance.

(2) If either the judge or the board finds
 after inspection that the facility is not being operated and maintained in conformity with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 207.1 or with the certification requirements or standards adopted under Section 210.2, the juvenile court or the board shall give notice of its finding to all persons having authority to securely detain juveniles in the facility, and, commencing 60 days thereafter, the facility shall not be used for the secure detention of a juvenile until the time the judge or the board, as the case may be, finds, after reinspection, that the conditions that rendered the facility unsuitable have been remedied, and the facility is a suitable place for the confinement of juveniles in conformity with all requirements of law.

(3) The custodian of each law enforcement facility that contains a lockup for adults shall make any report as may be requested by the board or by the juvenile court to effectuate the purposes of this
 subdivision.

(c) The board shall collect biennial data on the number, place, and duration of confinements of juveniles in jails and lockups, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 207.1, and shall publish biennially this information in the form as it deems appropriate for the purpose of providing public information on continuing compliance with the requirements of Section 207.1.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail shall be unsuitable for the confinement of juveniles if it is not in compliance with one or more of the minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections
 under Section 210, 210.2, 875, 885, or subdivision (e) of Section 207.1, and if, within 60 days of having received notice of noncompliance from the board or the judge of the juvenile court, the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail has failed to file an approved corrective action plan with the Board of State and Community Corrections to correct the condition or conditions of noncompliance of which it has been notified.

(2) (A) A
 corrective action plan shall outline how the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail plans to correct the issue of noncompliance and give a reasonable timeframe, not to exceed 90 days, for resolution, that the board shall either approve or deny.

(B) Subject to revocation, the board may delegate the authority to approve or disapprove a corrective action plan to the board’s executive director or a deputy director. A delegee shall approve or disapprove the corrective action plan in accordance with criteria and considerations for approval or disapproval, which the board shall develop. The approval or disapproval of a corrective action plan by a delegee shall be effective as of
 the date the determination is made by the delegee. If that determination is made more than 15 days prior to the board’s next regularly scheduled meeting, the board shall either ratify or overrule the delegee’s approval or disapproval of the corrective action plan at its next regularly scheduled meeting. If that determination is made 15 days or fewer prior to the board’s next regularly scheduled meeting, the board shall either ratify or overrule the delegee’s approval or disapproval of the corrective action plan at the first regularly scheduled meeting occurring after the next regularly scheduled meeting. The board’s ratification or overruling of the corrective action plan shall not alter the effective date of the delegee’s initial determination to approve or disapprove the corrective action plan or extend any time period for compliance.

(3) In the event the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, secure youth treatment facility, law enforcement facility, or jail fails to meet its commitment to resolve noncompliance issues outlined in its corrective action plan, the board shall make a determination of suitability at its next scheduled meeting.

(e) If a juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility is not in compliance with one or more of the minimum standards for juvenile facilities adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections under Section 210, 875, 885, or subdivision (e) of Section 207.1, and where the noncompliance arises from sustained occupancy levels that are above the population capacity permitted by applicable minimum standards, the juvenile hall shall be unsuitable for the confinement of juveniles if the board or the judge of the juvenile court
 determines that conditions in the facility pose a serious risk to the health, safety, or welfare of juveniles confined in the facility. In making its determination of suitability, the board or the judge of the juvenile court shall consider, in addition to the noncompliance with minimum standards, the totality of conditions in the juvenile hall, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility, including the extent and duration of overpopulation as well as staffing, program, physical plant, and medical and mental health care conditions in the facility. The Board of State and Community Corrections may develop guidelines and procedures for its determination of suitability in accordance with this subdivision and to assist counties in bringing their juvenile halls, special purpose juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility into full compliance with applicable minimum standards. This subdivision shall not be interpreted to exempt a juvenile hall, special purpose
 juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or secure youth treatment facility from having to correct, in accordance with subdivision (d), any minimum standard violations that are not directly related to overpopulation of the facility.

(f) All reports and notices of findings prepared by the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Board of State and Community Corrections’ internet website in a manner in which they are accessible to the public.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Juvenile” means a person who meets any of the following criteria:

(A) A person under 18 years of age.

(B) A person under the maximum age
 of juvenile court jurisdiction who is not currently an incarcerated adult as defined in paragraph (2) of this subdivision.

(C) A person whose case originated in the juvenile court and is subject to Section 208.5.

(2) “Incarcerated adult” means a person who is 18 years of age or older, not subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, and has been arrested and is in custody for, or awaiting trial on, a criminal charge, or has been convicted of a criminal offense, and is not a juvenile defined in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(3) “Subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court” means a person alleged or found to be subject to Section 601, 602, 607, or 875.

(h) This section does not require the judge of the juvenile court
 or the board to make determinations of suitability for local correctional facilities based on standards adopted pursuant to Section 6030 of the Penal Code.

(i) (1) The board may bring a civil action to enforce compliance with minimum standards for juvenile facilities or closure, as described in this section, in the superior court in the county in which a facility is located if the facility has received notice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(2) This subdivision does not preclude the Attorney General from conducting an independent investigation or bringing a civil action of its own to address violations of any applicable law.

(3) The board may seek any appropriate relief available under existing law,
 including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, orders compelling compliance, sanctions, and equitable relief it deems necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of juveniles in custody within the applicable county. The board may also seek attorney’s fees to the extent authorized by existing law.

(4) The board’s authority to bring a civil action pursuant to this section is in addition to any other enforcement authority and remedies available under existing law.

(5) The board’s authority to bring a civil action does not limit the ability of the affected county to seek any temporary or permanent relief from the obligations or consequences imposed by this section, to the extent that relief is available under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 22.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

210.

The Board of Corrections shall adopt minimum standards for the operation and maintenance of juvenile halls for the confinement of minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 694, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

210.1.

The Board of Corrections shall develop guidelines for the operation and maintenance of nonsecure placement facilities for persons alleged or found to be persons coming within the terms of Section 601 or 602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 12, Sec. 6.   Effective February 14, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

210.2.

(a) The Board of Corrections shall adopt regulations establishing standards for law enforcement facilities which contain lockups for adults and which are used for the temporary, secure detention of minors upon arrest under subdivision (b) of Section 207.1. The standards shall identify appropriate conditions of confinement for minors in law enforcement facilities, including standards for places within a police station or sheriff’s station where minors may be securely detained; standards regulating contact between minors and adults in custody in lockup, booking, or common areas; standards for the supervision of minors securely detained in these facilities; and any other related standard as the board deems appropriate to effectuate compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 207.1.

(b) Every person in charge of a law enforcement facility which contains a lockup for adults and which is used in any calendar year for the secure detention of any minor shall certify annually that the facility is in conformity with the regulations adopted by the board under subdivision (a). The certification shall be endorsed by the sheriff or chief of police of the jurisdiction in which the facility is located and shall be forwarded to and maintained by the board. The board may provide forms and instructions to local jurisdictions to facilitate compliance with this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 22.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

210.5.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best public interest to encourage innovations in staffing ratios, maximization of housing unit size, and experimentation with innovative architectural designs and program components, designs, or operations in the operation and maintenance of new juvenile detention facilities. Therefore, to these ends, Tulare County, as a demonstration project, may undertake the construction and operation of a juvenile detention facility, to be known as the “Tulare County Juvenile Facility,” that shall not be subject to laws or regulations governing staffing ratios and housing capacity for juvenile facilities except as provided in this section. Before the county proceeds with the construction and operation of the Tulare County Juvenile Facility, the schematics and the proposed staffing patterns of this project shall be subject to review and approval by the Board of Corrections, which shall consider the proposed regulations, applicable current case law, and appropriate juvenile correctional practices in order to determine the merits of the proposal and to ensure the safety and security of wards and the staff. Any review conducted by the Board of Corrections pursuant to this section shall consider community, inmate, and staff safety, and the extent to which the project makes the most efficient use of resources. In addition, progress reports and evaluative data regarding the success of the demonstration project shall be provided to the Board of Corrections by the county.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the applicability of the provisions of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 100, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

210.6.

(a) (1) Mechanical restraints, including, but not limited to, handcuffs, chains, irons, straitjackets or cloth or leather restraints, or other similar items, may be used on a juvenile detained in or committed to a local secure juvenile facility, camp, ranch, or forestry camp, as established pursuant to Sections 850 and 881, during transportation outside of the facility only upon a determination made by the probation department, in consultation with the transporting agency, that the mechanical restraints are necessary to prevent physical harm to the juvenile or another person or due to a substantial risk of flight.

(2) If a determination is made that mechanical restraints are necessary, the least restrictive form of
 restraint shall be used consistent with the legitimate security needs of each juvenile.

(3) A county probation department that chooses to use mechanical restraints other than handcuffs on juveniles shall establish procedures for the documentation of their use, including the reasons for the use of those mechanical restraints.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to mechanical restraints used by medical care providers in the course of medical care or transportation.

(b) (1) Mechanical restraints may only be used during a juvenile court proceeding if the court determines that the individual juvenile’s behavior in custody or in court establishes a manifest need to use mechanical restraints to prevent physical harm to the juvenile or another person or due to a substantial risk of flight.

(2) The burden to establish the need for mechanical restraints pursuant to paragraph (1) is on the prosecution.

(3) If the court determines that mechanical restraints are necessary, the least restrictive form of restraint shall be used and the reasons for the use of mechanical restraints shall be documented in the record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.   (AB 878)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

211.

(a) A person under the age of 14 years shall not be committed to a state prison or be transferred thereto from any other institution.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person under the age of 16 years shall not be housed in any facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 291.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

212.

There shall be no fee for filing a petition under this chapter nor shall any fees be charged by any public officer for his services in filing or serving papers or for the performance of any duty enjoined upon him by this chapter, except where the sheriff transports a person to a state institution. If the judge of the juvenile court orders that a ward or dependent child go to a state institution without being accompanied by an officer or that a ward or dependent child be taken to an institution by the probation officer of the county or parole officer of the institution or by some other suitable person, all expenses necessarily incurred therefor shall be allowed and paid in the same manner and from the same funds as such expenses would be allowed and paid were such transportation effected by the sheriff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

212.5.

(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, a document in a juvenile court matter may be filed and served electronically, as prescribed by Section 1010.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, under the following conditions:

(1) Electronic service is authorized only if the county and the court permit electronic service.

(2) (A) On or before December 31, 2018, electronic service on a party or other person is permitted only if the party or other person has consented to accept electronic service in that specific action. A party or other person may subsequently withdraw its consent to electronic service.

(B) On or after January 1, 2019, electronic service on a party or other person is permitted only if the party or other person has expressly consented, as provided in Section 1010.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure. A party or other person may subsequently withdraw its consent to electronic service by completing the appropriate Judicial Council form.

(3) Consent, or the withdrawal of consent, to receive electronic service may be completed by a party or other person entitled to service, or that person’s
 attorney.

(4) Electronic service shall be provided in the following manner:

(A) Electronic service is not permitted on any party or person who is under 10 years of age.

(B) Electronic service is not permitted on any party or person who is between 10 years of age and 15 years of age without the express consent of the minor and the minor’s attorney.

(C) Electronic service shall be permitted on any party or person who is 16 to 18 years of
 age, inclusive, only if the minor, after consultation with his or her attorney, consents. By January 1, 2019, the Judicial Council shall develop a rule of court on the duties of the minor’s attorney during the required consultation.

(D) Electronic service of psychological or medical documentation related to a minor shall not be permitted, other than the summary required pursuant to Section 16010 when included as part of a required report to the court.

(5) In the following matters, the party or other person shall be served by both electronic means and by other means specified by law if the document to be served is one of the following:

(A) A notice of hearing or an appellate advisement issued pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (l) of Section 366.26 for a hearing at which a social worker is recommending the termination of parental rights.

(B) A citation issued pursuant to Section 661.

(C) A notice of hearing pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 777.

(6) If
 it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, and the hearing may culminate in an order for foster care placement, termination of parental rights, preadoptive placement, or adoptive placement as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, service shall be made pursuant to Section
 224.3.

(7) Electronic service and electronic filing shall be conducted in a manner that preserves and ensures the confidentiality of records by encryption.

(8) The requirements of this section shall be consistent with Section 1010.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure and rules of court adopted
 by the Judicial Council pursuant to that section.

(b) This section does not preclude the use of electronic means to send information regarding the date, time, and place of a juvenile court hearing, without the need to comply with paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), provided that the requirement of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) is met. However, information shared, as described in this subdivision, shall only be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any required service or notification made in accordance with any other law governing how that service or notification is provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 21.5.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

213.

Any willful disobedience or interference with any lawful order of the juvenile court or of a judge or referee thereof constitutes a contempt of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

213.3.

A person under 18 years of age shall not be detained in a secure facility, as defined in Section 206, solely upon the ground that he or she is in willful disobedience or interference with any lawful order of the juvenile court, if the basis of an order of contempt is the failure to comply with a court order pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 601. Upon a finding of contempt of court, the court may issue any other lawful order, as necessary, to ensure the minor’s school attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 70, Sec. 3.   (SB 1296)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

213.5.

(a) After a petition has been filed pursuant to Section 311 to declare a child a dependent child of the juvenile court, and until the time that the petition is dismissed or dependency is terminated, upon application in the manner provided by Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in the manner provided by Section 6300 of the Family Code, if related to domestic violence, the juvenile court has exclusive jurisdiction to issue ex parte orders (1) enjoining a person from molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying the personal property, contacting, either
 directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of the child or any other child in the household; and (2) excluding a person from the dwelling of the person who has care, custody, and control of the child. A court may also issue an ex parte order enjoining a person from molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying the personal property, contacting, either directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of any parent, legal guardian, or current caretaker of the child, regardless of whether the child resides with that parent, legal guardian, or current caretaker, upon application in the manner
 provided by Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure or, if related to domestic violence, in the manner provided by Section 6300 of the Family Code. A court may also issue an ex parte order enjoining a person from molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying the personal property, contacting, either directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of the child’s current or former social worker or court appointed special advocate, upon application in the manner provided by Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure. On a showing of good cause, in an ex parte order issued pursuant to this subdivision in connection with an animal owned, possessed, leased,
 kept, or held by a person protected by the restraining order, or residing in the residence or household of a person protected by the restraining order, the court may do either or both of the following:

(1) Grant the applicant exclusive care, possession, or control of the animal.

(2) Order the restrained person to stay away from the animal and refrain from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, molesting, attacking, striking, threatening, harming, or otherwise disposing of the animal.

(b) After a petition has been filed pursuant to Section 601 or 602 to declare a child a ward of the juvenile court, and until the time that the petition is dismissed or wardship is terminated, upon application in the manner
 provided by Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure or, if related to domestic violence, in the manner provided by Section 6300 of the Family Code, the juvenile court may issue ex parte orders (1) enjoining a person from molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying the personal property, contacting, either directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of the child or any other child in the household; (2) excluding a person from the dwelling of the person who has care, custody, and control of the child; or (3) enjoining the child from contacting, threatening, stalking, or disturbing the peace of a person the court finds to be at risk from the conduct
 of the child, or with whom association would be detrimental to the child. A court may also issue an ex parte order enjoining a person from molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying the personal property, contacting, either directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of any parent, legal guardian, or current caretaker of the child, regardless of whether the child resides with that parent, legal guardian, or current caretaker, upon application in the manner provided by Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure or, if related to domestic violence, in the manner provided by Section 6300 of the Family Code. A court may also issue an ex parte order
 enjoining a person from molesting, attacking, striking, stalking, threatening, sexually assaulting, battering, harassing, telephoning, including, but not limited to, making annoying telephone calls as described in Section 653m of the Penal Code, destroying the personal property, contacting, either directly or indirectly, by mail or otherwise, coming within a specified distance of, or disturbing the peace of the child’s current or former probation officer or court appointed special advocate, upon application in the manner provided by Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure. On a showing of good cause, in an ex parte order issued pursuant to this subdivision in connection with an animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by a person protected by the restraining order, or residing in the residence or household of a person protected by the restraining order, the court may do either or both of
 the following:

(1) Grant the applicant exclusive care, possession, or control of the animal.

(2) Order the respondent to stay away from the animal and refrain from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, molesting, attacking, striking, threatening, harming, or otherwise disposing of the animal.

(c) (1) If a temporary restraining order is granted without notice, the matter shall be made returnable on an order requiring cause to be shown why the order should not be granted, on the earliest day that the business of the court will permit, but not later than 21 days or, if good cause appears to the court, 25 days from the date the temporary restraining order is granted. The court may, on the motion
 of the person seeking the restraining order, or on its own motion, shorten the time for the service of the order to show cause on the person to be restrained.

(2) The respondent shall be entitled, as a matter of course, to one continuance, for a reasonable period, to respond to the petition.

(3) Either party may request a continuance of the hearing, which the court shall grant on a showing of good cause. The request may be made in writing before or at the hearing or orally at the hearing. The court may also grant a continuance on its own motion.

(4) If the court grants a continuance, a temporary restraining order that has been issued shall remain in effect until the end of the continued hearing, unless otherwise ordered by the
 court. In granting a continuance, the court may modify or terminate a temporary restraining order.

(5) A hearing pursuant to this section may be held simultaneously with any regularly scheduled hearings held in proceedings to declare a child a dependent child or ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602, or subsequent hearings regarding the dependent child or ward.

(d) (1) The juvenile court may issue, upon notice and a hearing, any of the orders set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). A restraining order granted pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in effect, in the discretion of the court, no more than three years, unless otherwise terminated by the court, extended by mutual consent of all parties to the restraining order,
 or extended by further order of the court on the motion of any party to the restraining order.

(2) If an action is filed for the purpose of terminating or modifying a protective order prior to the expiration date specified in the order by a party other than the protected party, the party who is protected by the order shall be given notice, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1005 of the Code of Civil Procedure, of the proceeding by personal service or, if the protected party has satisfied the requirements of Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, by service on the Secretary of State. If the party who is protected by the order cannot be notified prior to the hearing for modification or termination of the protective order, the juvenile court shall deny the motion to modify or
 terminate the order without prejudice or continue the hearing until the party who is protected can be properly noticed and may, upon a showing of good cause, specify another method for service of process that is reasonably designed to afford actual notice to the protected party. The protected party may waive the right to notice if the party is physically present and does not challenge the sufficiency of the notice.

(e) (1) The juvenile court may issue an order made pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (d) excluding a person from a residence or dwelling. This order may be issued for the time and on the conditions that the court determines, regardless of which party holds legal or equitable title or is the lessee of the residence or dwelling.

(2) The court
 may issue an order under paragraph (1) only on a showing of all of the following:

(A) Facts sufficient for the court to ascertain that the party who will stay in the dwelling has a right under color of law to possession of the premises.

(B) That the party to be excluded has assaulted or threatens to assault the other party or any other person under the care, custody, and control of the other party, or a minor child of the parties or of the other party.

(C) That physical or emotional harm would otherwise result to the other party, to a person under the care, custody, and control of the other party, or to a minor child of the parties or of the other party.

(f) An order issued pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) shall state on its face the date of expiration of the order.

(g) (1) In a case where a court issues a protective order pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), Section 6389 of the Family Code shall apply. In accordance with that section, the court shall make a determination as to whether the restrained person is in possession or control of a firearm or ammunition, as provided in Section 6322.5 of the Family
 Code.

(2) Subdivision (m) of Section 6389 of the Family Code does not apply if the restrained person is a child under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602.

(h) All data with respect to a juvenile court protective order, or extension, modification, or termination thereof, granted pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), shall be transmitted by the court or its designee, within one business day, to law enforcement personnel by either one of the following methods:

(1) Transmitting a physical copy of the order to a local law enforcement agency authorized by the Department of Justice to enter orders into the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System
 (CLETS).

(2) With the approval of the Department of Justice, entering the order into CLETS directly.

(i) A willful and knowing violation of an order granted pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) shall be a misdemeanor punishable under Section 273.65 of the Penal Code.

(j) A juvenile court restraining order related to domestic violence issued by a court pursuant to this section shall be issued on forms adopted by the Judicial Council and that have been approved by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 6380 of the Family Code. However, the fact that an order issued by a court pursuant to this section was not issued on forms adopted by the Judicial Council and approved by the
 Department of Justice shall not, in and of itself, make the order unenforceable.

(k) (1) Prior to a hearing on the issuance or denial of an order under this part, a search shall be conducted as described in subdivision (a) of Section 6306 of the Family Code.

(2) Prior to deciding whether to issue an order under this part, the court shall consider the following information obtained pursuant to a search conducted under paragraph (1): a conviction for a violent felony specified in Section 667.5 of the Penal Code or a serious felony specified in Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code; a misdemeanor conviction involving domestic violence, weapons, or other violence; an outstanding warrant; parole or probation status; a prior restraining order; and a violation of a prior restraining
 order.

(3) (A) If the results of the search conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) indicate that an outstanding warrant exists against the subject of the search, the court shall order the clerk of the court to immediately notify, by the most effective means available, appropriate law enforcement officials of information obtained through the search that the court determines is appropriate. The law enforcement officials notified shall take all actions necessary to execute outstanding warrants or any other actions, as appropriate and as soon as practicable.

(B) If the results of the search conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) indicate that the subject of the search is currently on parole or probation, the court shall order the clerk of the court to immediately notify,
 by the most effective means available, the appropriate parole or probation officer of information obtained through the search that the court determines is appropriate. The parole or probation officer notified shall take all actions necessary to revoke parole or probation, or any other actions, with respect to the subject person, as appropriate and as soon as practicable.

(l) Upon making any order for custody or visitation pursuant to this section, the court shall follow the procedures specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 6323 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 685, Sec. 14.   (SB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

213.6.

(a) If a person named in a temporary restraining order or emergency protective order issued under this part is personally served with the order and notice of hearing with respect to a subsequent restraining order or protective order based thereon, but the person does not appear at the hearing either in person or by counsel, and the terms and conditions of the restraining order or protective order are identical to those of the prior temporary restraining order, except for the duration of the order, the subsequent restraining order or protective order may be served on the person by first-class mail sent to that person at the most current address for the person available to the court.

(b) The judicial forms for temporary restraining orders or emergency protective orders issued under this part shall contain a statement in substantially the following form:
